Utah statutes.
10-3-716.   Fines and forfeitures -- Disposition.
All fines, penalties, and forfeitures for the violation of any ordinance, when
collected, shall be paid in accordance with Section 51-4-2.  A violation of
this section constitutes a class C misdemeanor. The retention or use of any
fine, penalty, or forfeiture by any person for personal use or benefit
constitutes a class B misdemeanor, except that if the amount or amounts exceed
$1,000 the offense is a class A misdemeanor as defined in the Utah Criminal
Code.
